Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 33.2-1900.
Declaration of policy.

The development of transportation systems, composed of transit facilities, public highways, and other modes of transport, is necessary for the orderly growth and development of the urban areas of the Commonwealth; for the safety, comfort, and convenience of its citizens; and for the economical utilization of public funds. The provision of the necessary facilities and services cannot be achieved by the unilateral action of the counties and cities, and the attainment thereof requires planning and action on a regional basis, conducted cooperatively and on a continuing basis, between representatives of the affected political subdivisions and the Commonwealth Transportation Board. In those urban areas of the Commonwealth that together form a single metropolitan area, solutions must be jointly sought with the affected political subdivisions and highway departments. Such joint action should be conducted in a manner that preserves, to the extent the necessity for joint action permits, local autonomy over patterns of growth and development of each participating political subdivision or locality. The requisite joint action may best be achieved through the device of a transportation district, having the powers, functions, and duties set forth in this chapter. In the provision of improved or expanded transit facilities, it is the policy of the Commonwealth to make use of private enterprise to the extent reasonably practicable.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1343; 1986, c. 438; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4501; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1901.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Agency”
or

“such agency”

means an agency authorized by, or arising from action of, the General Assembly to plan for or provide transportation facilities and service for a metropolitan area located wholly or in part in the Commonwealth.

“Commission”
or

“district commission”

means the governing body of a district.

“Component governments”
means the counties and cities composing a transportation district and the various departments, bureaus, and divisions of such counties and cities.

“District”
means a transportation district authorized to be created by this chapter.

“Governing bodies”
means the boards of supervisors of counties and councils of cities composing a transportation district.

“Metropolitan area”
means a metropolitan statistical area as defined by the U.S. Census Bureau and the Office of Management and Budget or any contiguous counties or cities within the Commonwealth that together constitute an urban area.

“Person”
means an individual, partnership, association, or corporation or any governmental agency or authority.

“State,”
when applied to a part of the United States, includes any of the 50 states and the District of Columbia.

“Transportation facilities,” “transit facilities,”
or

“facilities”

means all those matters and things utilized in rendering transportation service by means of rail, bus, water, or air and any other mode of travel, including tracks, rights-of-way, bridges, tunnels, subways, and rolling stock for rail, motor vehicle, marine, and air transportation; stations, terminals, and ports; areas for parking; buildings; structures; and all equipment, fixtures, and business activities reasonably required for the performance of transportation service, but does not include any such facilities owned by any person, company, association, or corporation the major part of whose transportation service extends beyond a transportation district created in this chapter.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1344; 1986, c. 438; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4502; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to statements to be filed with Commonwealth Transportation Board by transit systems, see §

33.2-219

.

§ 33.2-1902.
Authorization to issue summons.

Conductors of railroad trains, motormen, and station and depot agents of any transportation district created pursuant to this chapter shall have the power to issue a summons for any violation of §

18.2-160.1

with respect to any train operated by or under contract with such transportation district.

History.

1988, c. 762, § 15.1-1344.1; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4503; 2014, c. 805.